District of Columbia statutes.
28:1-102

Scope of article.

This article applies to a transaction to the extent that it is governed by another article of this subtitle.

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 2, 60 DCR 2634

History

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-519.

Section References

Source: New.

1. This section is intended to resolve confusion that has occasionally arisen as to the applicability of the substantive rules in this article. This section makes clear what has always been the case — the rules in Article 1 apply to transactions to the extent that those transactions are governed by one of the other articles of the Uniform Commercial Code. See also Comment 1 to Section 1-301.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment